apertium-ces-ces.ces.dix
    <pardef n="BASE__rok">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>k</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ky</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ku</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ků</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ku</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kům</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>k</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ky</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ku</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ky</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ku</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ce</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>kách</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cích</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>kem</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ky</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>kama</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ro/k__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>k<s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__rok"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Dubrovník__np">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>k<s n="np"/><s n="top"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__rok"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="l/ípa__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ípa</l>
        <r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ípy</l>
        <r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ípy</l>
        <r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>íp</l>
        <r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ip</l>
        <r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ípě</l>
        <r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ípám</l>
        <r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ipám</l>
        <r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ípu</l>
        <r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ípy</l>
        <r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ípo</l>
        <r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ípy</l>
        <r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ípě</l>
        <r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ípách</l>
        <r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ipách</l>
        <r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ípou</l>
        <r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ípami</l>
        <r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ipami</l>
        <r>ípa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="chlap/ec__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ec</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ci</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ce</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ců</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ci</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>covi</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cům</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ce</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ce</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>če</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ci</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ci</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>covi</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cích</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cem</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ci</l>
        <r>ec<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <e lm="Japonec"><i>Japon</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Kubánec"><i>Kubán</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Makedonec"><i>Makedon</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Portugalec"><i>Portugal</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Vietnamec"><i>Vietnam</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barok"><i>baro</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bezdomovec"><i>bezdomov</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bok"><i>bo</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="vrabec"><p><l>brab</l><r>vrab</r></p><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bratranec"><i>bratran</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="běženec"><i>běžen</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="drink"><i>drin</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="obrubník" r="LR"><p><l>vobrubní</l><r>obrubní</r></p><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="protinožec"><i>protinož</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="protiútok"><i>protiúto</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chlapec"><i>chlap</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chodec"><i>chod</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cizinec"><i>cizin</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="deštník"><i>deštní</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dopravník"><i>dopravní</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="draslík"><i>draslí</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dravec"><i>drav</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dělostřelec"><i>dělostřel</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="frak"><i>fra</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hadřík"><i>hadří</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="herec"><i>her</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hlodavec"><i>hlodav</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="horolezec"><i>horolez</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hák"><i>há</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jazykovědec"><i>jazykověd</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jezdec"><i>jezd</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="joystick"><i>joystic</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kbelík"><i>kbelí</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="knihkupec"><i>knihkup</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="konečník"><i>koneční</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="konzervativec"><p><l>konservativ</l><r>konzervativ</r></p><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="košík"><i>koší</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="krasavec"><i>krasav</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kulečník"><i>kuleční</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="křižník"><i>křižní</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kříženec"><i>křížen</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lípa"><i>l</i><par n="l/ípa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lesk"><i>les</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="letec"><i>let</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lunapark"><i>lunapar</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="maratonec"><i>maraton</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mořeplavec"><i>mořeplav</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mítink"><i>mítin</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nadšenec"><i>nadšen</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="notebook"><i>noteboo</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="obdélník"><i>obdélní</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="obratlovec"><i>obratlov</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="odtok"><i>odto</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="otazník"><i>otazní</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="panelák"><i>panelá</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="piják"><i>pijá</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plavec"><i>plav</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="potlesk"><i>potles</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="průsmyk"><i>průsmy</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="punk"><i>pun</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="převodník"><p><l>převodn</l><r>převodní</r></p><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="přistěhovalec"><i>přistěhoval</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="příznivec"><i>přízniv</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rok"><i>ro</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="roztok"><i>rozto</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="samec"><i>sam</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skok"><i>sko</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sourozenec"><i>sourozen</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spacák"><i>spacá</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stařec"><i>stař</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="styk"><i>sty</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="střelec"><i>střel</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tabák"><i>tabá</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tlak"><i>tla</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="torpédoborec"><i>torpédobor</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trojúhelník"><i>trojúhelní</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="třesk"><i>třes</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="umělec"><i>uměl</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vak"><i>va</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="velvyslanec"><i>velvyslan</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vosk"><i>vos</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vyslanec"><i>vyslan</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="výfuk"><i>výfu</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zajatec"><i>zajat</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zisk"><i>zis</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zmocněnec"><i>zmocněn</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zoufalec"><i>zoufal</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zápisník"><i>zápisní</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="činžák"><i>činžá</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="štěrk"><i>štěr</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="argentinec"><i>argentin</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trhovec"><i>trhov</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
    <e lm="veletok"><i>veleto</i><par n="ro/k__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zvědavec"><i>zvědav</i><par n="chlap/ec__n"/></e>
